Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 1

Reception of Inmates

41-21-101. Escort furnished by commissioner.

The commissioner of correction shall designate some official or employee, or may appoint some other suitable person, to go after inmates, at the places of their conviction, and to take the inmates to such places as the commissioner may direct.

Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 10; impl. am. Acts. 1915, ch. 7, § 10; Shan., § 7516a1; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 42, 60; Code 1932, § 12113; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-201.

Cross-References. Commitment to jail pending removal to penitentiary, § 41-4-103.

Counselors of correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Precautions on reception of prisoners, § 41-21-109.

Prompt removal of prisoner, § 40-23-107.

Regional state workhouses, title 41, ch. 1, part 6.

Removal of prisoner by sheriff, § 40-23-103.

Removal of prisoners to penitentiary, §§ 40-23-107 — 40-23-112.

Transfer of prisoners from county workhouse, § 41-2-121.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

The Privatization of Correctional Institutions: The Tennessee Experience (W.J. Michael Cody, Andy D. Bennett), 40 Vand. L. Rev. 829 (1987).

41-21-102. Persons sentenced to imprisonment.

Inmates sentenced to the penitentiary for life, or any term of time, by any court of this state or of the United States held within this state, shall be received into the penitentiary by the warden of the penitentiary, when delivered upon proper authority, and there kept in pursuance of the sentence.

Code 1858, § 5494 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 28); Shan., § 7514; Code 1932, § 12110; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-202.

41-21-103. Reception on commutation of sentence.

The warden shall also receive into the penitentiary, under the order of the governor, any person convicted of any crime punishable with death or other punishment, where the sentence is commuted to imprisonment, either for life or a term of years in the penitentiary, and confine that person according to the terms of the commutation.

Code 1858, § 5496; Shan., § 7516; Code 1932, § 12112; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-203.

41-21-104. Delivery of copy of sentence.

A certified copy of the sentence shall be delivered with each inmate to the warden of the penitentiary and registered in a book kept by the warden for that purpose.

Code 1858, § 5495; Shan., § 7515; Code 1932, § 12111; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-204.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

41-21-105. Copy of indictment furnished.

Clerks of the criminal and circuit courts of the state are required to furnish the wardens of the state prisons certified copies of all indictments against persons convicted in those courts and sentenced to state prison, at the same time the clerk furnishes the warden copies of the judgment and commitment papers on the convicted person.

For every certified copy of an indictment furnished the warden by the clerks, they shall be paid a fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25), which shall be taxed and paid as other criminal costs are taxed and paid in criminal cases.

The clerks of the criminal and circuit courts also shall furnish the central records division of the department of correction a copy of the indictment, judgment and commitment papers of persons convicted of a felony and sentenced to serve a sentence in a local detention facility, for which the clerks shall be paid a fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25), which shall be taxed as other criminal costs and paid in criminal cases.

Acts 1945, ch. 174, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12111.1; Acts 1965, ch. 355, § 5; 1976, ch. 547, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-205.

Cross-References. Report by sheriff of convict's background, § 40-23-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319 (1978).

41-21-106. Report of confinement of first offenders.

Wardens and superintendents shall report the confinement of first term inmates to the division of rehabilitative services within twenty-four (24) hours following the inmates' arrival.

Acts 1949, ch. 257, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12110.1 (Williams, § 12104.1); Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-206.

Law Reviews.

Problem of Age and Jurisdiction in the Juvenile Court (C. William Reiney), 19 Vand. L. Rev. 833 (1966).

41-21-107. Information recorded on reception.

It is the duty of the warden of the Tennessee state penitentiary upon the reception of any inmate to:

Take a complete description of the inmate;

Take the inmate's fingerprints and photograph;

Record the county in which convicted, the nature of the crime and the period of imprisonment;

Obtain from the inmate a full and complete statement, giving a brief history of the inmate's past life, showing past residences, the names and post office addresses of all near relatives, and such other facts as may tend to show the past habits and character of the inmate; and

Have the inmate undergo HIV testing, with or without the inmate's consent, through a licensed medical laboratory, unless the inmate has been tested pursuant to § 39-13-521 before reception. Unless previously tested, the inmate shall undergo HIV testing and shall also undergo a confirmatory test and be referred to appropriate counseling when necessary.

The result of any HIV test ordered under this subdivision (a)(5) is not a public record and shall be available only to:

The person tested;

The attending physician of the person tested;

The department of health; and

The department of correction;

For purposes of this section, “HIV test” means a test of an individual for the presence of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), or for antibodies or antigens that result from HIV infection, or for any other substance specifically indicating infection with HIV. The department of correction shall promulgate rules providing for the testing of inmates for HIV, and those rules shall be consistent with the rules and procedures of the department of health;

This subdivision (a)(5) only applies to inmates less than twenty-one (21) years of age.

The warden shall, by correspondence or otherwise, seek to verify or disprove any statements or information obtained from the inmate and pursuant to this section shall preserve the record so obtained as a part of the official records of the Tennessee state penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5499 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7517; Code 1932, § 12114; Acts 1943, ch. 68, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12114; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-207; Acts 1997, ch. 298, § 1.

41-21-108. Search of inmate and baggage.

The baggage and person of the inmate shall also be carefully searched and every instrument taken from the inmate by which the inmate may effect an escape.

Code 1858, § 5500 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7518; Code 1932, § 12115; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-208.

41-21-109. Precautions against contagious disease.

To prevent the introduction of contagious disorders, the warden shall cause every person sentenced to the penitentiary to be washed, cleansed and kept entirely apart from the other inmates until it is certified by the physician that the inmate may be permitted to join them in labor without danger to their health.

Code 1858, § 5501 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 34); Shan., § 7519; Code 1932, § 12116; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-209.